Utah statutes.
67-5b-102.   Children's Justice Center -- Requirements of center -- Purposes of center.

(1) (a)  There is established a program that provides a comprehensive, multidisciplinary, nonprofit, intergovernmental response to sexual abuse of children, physical abuse of children, and other crimes involving children where the child is a primary victim or a critical witness, such as in drug-related child endangerment cases, in a facility known as a Children's Justice Center.

(b)  The attorney general shall administer the program.

(c)  The attorney general shall:

(i)  allocate the funds appropriated by a line item pursuant to Section 67-5b-103;

(ii)  administer applications for state and federal grants;

(iii)  staff the Advisory Board on Children's Justice;

(iv)  assist in the development of new centers; and

(v)  coordinate services between centers.

(2) (a)  The attorney general shall establish Children's Justice Centers or satellite offices in Cache County, Carbon County, Davis County, Duchesne County, Emery County, Grand County, Iron County, Salt Lake County, Tooele County, Uintah County, Utah County, Wasatch County, Washington County, and Weber County.

(b)  The attorney general may establish other centers within a county and in other counties of the state.

(3)  The attorney general and each center shall fulfill the statewide purpose of each center by:

(a)  minimizing the time and duplication of effort required to investigate, prosecute, and initiate treatment for the abused child in the state;

(b)  facilitating the investigation of the alleged offense against the abused child;

(c)  conducting interviews of abused children and their families in a professional manner;

(d)  obtaining reliable and admissible information which can be used effectively in criminal and child protection proceedings in the state;

(e)  coordinating and tracking:

(i)  the use of limited medical and psychiatric services;

(ii)  investigation of the alleged offense;

(iii)  preparation of prosecution;

(iv)  treatment of the abused child and family; and

(v)  education and training of persons who provide services to the abused child and its family in the state;

(f)  expediting the processing of the case through the courts in the state;

(g)  protecting the interest of the abused child and the community in the state;

(h)  reducing trauma to the abused child in the state;

(i)  enhancing the community understanding of sexual abuse of children, physical abuse of children, and other crimes in the state involving children where the child is a primary victim or a critical witness, such as in drug-related child endangerment cases;

(j)  providing as many services as possible that are required for the thorough and effective investigation of child abuse cases; and

(k)  enhancing the community understanding of criminal offenses committed against or in the presence of children.

(4)  To assist a center in fulfilling the requirements and statewide purposes as provided in Subsection (3), each center may obtain access to any relevant juvenile court legal records and adult court legal records, unless sealed by the court.

(5)  The statewide purpose of this chapter is to establish a program that provides a comprehensive, multidisciplinary, nonprofit, intergovernmental response to sexual abuse of children, physical abuse of children, and other crimes involving children where the child is a primary victim or a critical witness, such as drug-related child endangerment cases, in a facility known as a Children's Justice Center.

